Idaho, session 2026, H0712.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 5, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-528, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-528. IDAHO STATE SEAL OF EXCELLENCE IN CIVICS PROGRAM. (1) The
legislature finds that a strong constitutional republic relies on citizens
who possess civic knowledge, civic skills, civic values, and a commitment to
constructive civic participation. It is the intent of the legislature to es-
tablish a voluntary diploma endorsement program recognizing Idaho students
who have achieved excellence in civics education and civic engagement.
(2) There is hereby established the Idaho state seal of excellence in
civics to recognize graduating high school students who have attained a high
level of civics proficiency and civic engagement.
(3) Participation in the Idaho state seal of excellence in civics pro-
gram is voluntary for school districts and public charter schools. A school
district or public charter school shall notify the superintendent of public
instruction of its intent to participate. Each participating school dis-
trict or public charter school shall:
(a) Maintain records of students who meet program requirements;
(b) Identify each eligible student prior to graduation;
(c) Affix the state seal to each eligible student's diploma and note the
award on the student's transcript; and
(d) Allow eligible students to wear a red, white, and blue honor cord
during graduation ceremonies to recognize the achievement.
(4) To earn the Idaho state seal of excellence in civics, a student
shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Demonstrate civic knowledge by:
(i) Successful completion of all state-required social studies
coursework for graduation with an overall GPA of 3.25 or higher in
such courses;
(ii) Demonstrating mastery, which shall be ninety percent (90%)
or higher, on the Idaho civics assessment required by section
33-1602, Idaho Code; and
(iii) Completion of a civics inquiry or research project, which
may include:
1. A civics readiness research project;
2. A capstone paper or presentation;


3. An advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or
dual credit civics or government project; or
4. A standards-aligned civics inquiry investigation;
(b) Demonstrate civic participation by completing at least three (3) of
the following:
(i) Service learning or community service, requiring completion
of at least fifty (50) hours of voluntary service with a public
agency, school, nonprofit organization, or charitable organiza-
tion that contributes to the public good. Students who enlist in
the armed forces of the United States prior to graduation shall be
deemed to have met this requirement;
(ii) Civic engagement activities, requiring participation in at
least fifteen (15) hours of civic engagement activities, such as
public meetings, mock trial, model united nations, American le-
gion boys state or American legion auxiliary girls state, youth
legislature, local government internship, or student government;
(iii) Completion of at least two (2) approved civic learning pro-
grams, including:
1. Junior reserve officers' training corps, with a minimum
two (2) year participation;
2. Summer civics institutes;
3. School-sponsored extracurricular civics programs; or
4. Projects aligned to Idaho and United States government
standards; or
(iv) Civics-related work experience, including internships,
volunteering, and other work-based learning opportunities; and
(c) Demonstrate good attendance and not incur any major disciplinary
infractions, as defined by local school board policy.
(5) The state seal shall be affixed to the diploma of a student who sat-
isfies the requirements of this section and shall be noted on the student's
official transcript. The state superintendent of public instruction shall
design and produce the insignia and deliver appropriate quantities to par-
ticipating school districts and public charter schools at no cost to stu-
dents.
(6) The state department of education shall provide participating
school districts and public charter schools with implementation guidance
surrounding participation in the state seal of excellence in civics program,
including:
(a) Rubrics, examples of eligible activities, and reporting templates;
(b) Professional development to support instruction aligned to civics
proficiency; and
(c) Annually, a list of approved civic learning programs. Schools may
design local projects, assessments, or activities that align with state
civics standards.
(7) Participating school districts and public charter schools shall
report to the state department of education by August 1 each year:
(a) The number of students awarded the Idaho state seal of excellence in
civics; and
(b) Aggregate data on student participation in civic learning path-
ways.


(8) Any school that demonstrates that seventy-five percent (75%) or
more of its graduating senior students have earned the Idaho state seal of
excellence in civics shall be identified by the state department of educa-
tion as an Idaho school of civics excellence.
(9) The state department of education shall publish an annual statewide
summary for the Idaho legislature, governor, and communities regarding ex-
cellence in civics throughout the state.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.